Colorado, session 2026A, HB1297.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1-410.6, amend (2),
(3)(a)(III), and (4) introductory portion as follows:
18-1-410.6. Relief from improperly entered guilty pleas for
certain misdemeanor and municipal offenses - legislative declaration.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that noncitizen
defendants must have the opportunity to meaningfully challenge an
unconstitutionally entered guilty plea for certain class 1 misdemeanors,
class 2 misdemeanors, class 3 misdemeanors, traffic misdemeanors
MISDEMEANOR TRAFFIC OFFENSES, petty offenses, and municipal offenses.
(3) (a) Notwithstanding a limitation contained in section 16-5-402,
a municipal ordinance, or a municipal court rule of procedure, at any time
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

following the entry of a guilty plea, a criminal defendant may challenge the
guilty plea on the grounds set forth in subsection (4) of this section to a:
(III) Traffic Misdemeanor TRAFFIC OFFENSE; or
(4) A defendant moving to vacate a guilty plea to a class 1, class 2,
or class 3 misdemeanor as classified at the time the guilty plea was entered;
a traffic misdemeanor TRAFFIC OFFENSE; a petty offense; or a municipal
offense, must, in good faith, allege the following:
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-501, amend
(1)(c) as follows:
18-1.3-501. Misdemeanors classified - drug misdemeanors and
drug petty offenses classified - penalties - legislative intent - definitions.
(1) (c) A term of imprisonment in a county jail for a conviction of
a misdemeanor, petty, or traffic misdemeanor TRAFFIC offense shall not be
ordered to be served consecutively to a sentence to be served in a state
correctional facility; except that if, at the time of sentencing, the court
determines, after consideration of all the relevant facts and circumstances,
that a concurrent sentence is not warranted, the court may order that the
misdemeanor sentence be served prior to the sentence to be served in the
state correctional facility and prior to the time the defendant is transported
to the state correctional facility to serve all or the remainder of the
defendant's state correctional facility sentence.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-602, amend (2)
and (4)(a)(I) as follows:
18-1.3-602. Definitions.
As used in this part 6, unless the context otherwise requires:
(2) "Conviction" means a verdict of guilty by a judge or jury or a
plea of guilty or nolo contendere that is accepted by the court for a felony,
misdemeanor, petty offense, or traffic misdemeanor TRAFFIC offense, or
adjudication for an offense that would constitute a criminal offense if
committed by an adult. "Conviction" also includes having received a
deferred judgment and sentence or deferred adjudication; except that a
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1297

person shall IS not be deemed to have been convicted if the person has
successfully completed a deferred sentence or deferred adjudication.
(4) (a) "Victim" means any person aggrieved by the conduct of an
offender and includes, but is not limited to, the following:
(I) Any person against whom any felony, misdemeanor, petty, or
traffic misdemeanor TRAFFIC offense has been perpetrated or attempted;
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-603, amend (1)
introductory portion as follows:
18-1.3-603. Assessment of restitution - corrective orders.
(1) Every order of conviction of a felony, misdemeanor, petty
offense, or traffic misdemeanor TRAFFIC offense, except any order of
conviction for a state traffic misdemeanor TRAFFIC offense issued by a
municipal or county court in which the prosecuting attorney is acting as a
special deputy district attorney pursuant to an agreement with the district
attorney's office, must include consideration of restitution. Each order must
include one or more of the following:
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-2-132.5, amend
(10)(a) as follows:
42-2-132.5. Mandatory and voluntary restricted licenses
following alcohol convictions - rules.
(10) Operating vehicle after circumventing interlock device.
(a) A person whose privilege to drive is restricted to the operation
of a motor vehicle equipped with an approved ignition interlock device and
who operates a motor vehicle other than a motor vehicle equipped with an
approved ignition interlock device or who circumvents or attempts to
circumvent the proper use of an approved ignition interlock device commits
a class 1 traffic misdemeanor TRAFFIC OFFENSE.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-2-206, amend
(1)(a)(I) and (1)(b)(II) as follows:
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1297

42-2-206. Driving after revocation prohibited.
(1) (a) (I) It is unlawful for any person to operate any motor vehicle
in this state while the revocation of the department prohibiting the operation
remains in effect. Any person found to be an habitual offender who operates
a motor vehicle in this state while the revocation of the department
prohibiting such THE operation is in effect commits a class 2 traffic
misdemeanor TRAFFIC OFFENSE.
(b) (II) Aggravated driving with a revoked license is a class 1 traffic
misdemeanor TRAFFIC OFFENSE; except that a court shall sentence the
offender to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of sixty days in the
custody of a county jail.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-2-405.5, amend (1)
as follows:
42-2-405.5. Violations of out-of-service order.
(1) A person who operates a commercial motor vehicle in violation
of an out-of-service order commits a class 1 traffic misdemeanor TRAFFIC
OFFENSE.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-705, amend
(3)(b)(II) as follows:
42-4-705. Operation of vehicle approached by emergency vehicle
- operation of vehicle approaching stationary emergency vehicle,
stationary towing carrier vehicle, or stationary public utility service
vehicle.
(3) (b) (II) If the person violates subsection (2) of this section and
the person's actions are the proximate cause of bodily injury to another
person, the person commits a class 1 traffic misdemeanor TRAFFIC OFFENSE.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1301, amend
(2)(d)(II) as follows:
42-4-1301. Driving under the influence - driving while impaired
- driving with excessive alcoholic content - definitions - penalties.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1297

(2) (d) (II) A second or subsequent violation of this paragraph (d)
SUBSECTION (2)(d) is a class 2 traffic misdemeanor TRAFFIC OFFENSE.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1402.5, amend
(3)(a) as follows:
42-4-1402.5. Vulnerable road user - prohibition - violations and
penalties - definition.
(3) Violations and penalties.
(a) Infliction of serious bodily injury to a vulnerable road user is a
class 1 traffic misdemeanor TRAFFIC OFFENSE.
SECTION 11. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1297

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1297